Utah statutes.
57-8-51.   Appointment of receiver.

In an action by an association of unit owners to collect an assessment or to foreclose a lien for an unpaid assessment, a court may:

(1)  appoint a receiver, in accordance with Section 7-2-9, to collect and hold money alleged to be due and owing to a unit owner:

(a)  before commencement of the action; or

(b)  during the pendency of the action; and

(2)  order the receiver to pay the association of unit owners, to the extent of the association's common expense assessment, money the receiver holds under Subsection (1).

